Hawaii, session 2025, SB506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that over the past four decades, the value of all agricultural products in the State has been in decline.  Investing in the State's agricultural data and statistics gathering system is a necessary and critical component to the revitalization and future of Hawaii's agricultural sector. The legislature further finds that utilizing modern data and statistics gathering methodologies can promote access to high-quality data, which can then be used to help empower policymakers and agricultural stakeholders in making informed decisions and supporting sustainable farming practices.  Improving the technical, data-gathering component of the department of agriculture is necessary to provide the State and its farmers with the ability to track and anticipate patterns of agricultural activity, guide land use practices, support commodity investment and agricultural resource development, and inform future infrastructure investments. Accordingly, the purpose of the Act is to appropriate funds to the department of agriculture to conduct a study of agricultural markets for Hawaii farmers and to establish positions to conduct and collect relevant agricultural data for public consumption. SECTION 2. (a)  The department of agriculture shall conduct a study on agricultural markets for Hawaii farmers, which shall include strategies and actions that support agriculture and a robust agricultural sector in the State. (b) The department of agriculture shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for a one year study of agricultural markets for Hawaii farmers. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of: (1)  One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position data scientist, statistician, or market analyst to conduct data analysis; and (2)  One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position field researcher to collect relevant agricultural data for the agricultural statistics services to build an agricultural data dashboard for public consumption. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________